Alaska, session 34, HB369.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 09 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section 10 to read: 11 LEGISLATIVE INTENT. (a) It is the intent of the legislature that 12 (1) the state achieve a 15 percent increase in energy efficiency on a per capita 13 basis between 2026 and 2036; 01 (2) the state receive 40 percent of its electric generation from diversified 02 energy sources by the end of 2036; 03 (3) the state work to ensure a reliable in-state gas supply for residents of the 04 state; 05 (4) the power project fund (AS 42.45.010) serve as the main source of state 06 assistance for energy projects; 07 (5) the state remain a leader in petroleum and natural gas production and 08 become a global leader in carbon management, critical minerals exploration, detection, and 09 production, and emerging clean energy technologies; 10 (6) the average cost of electricity in the state decrease to the national average 11 by 2040. 12 (b) It is the intent of the legislature that implementation of the diversified portfolio 13 standard under AS 42.05.900 not result in undue economic harm to ratepayers or compromise 14 energy reliability. 15 * Sec. 2. AS 42.05 is amended by adding a new section to read: 16 Sec. 42.05.323. Portable solar generation devices. (a) A portable solar 17 generation device is exempt from utility interconnection and net metering program 18 requirements adopted by the commission if the device 19 (1) has a maximum power output of not more than 1,200 watts; 20 (2) includes a feature that prevents the device from energizing the 21 building's electrical system during a power outage; 22 (3) meets the standards of the most recent version of the National 23 Electrical Code; and 24 (4) is certified by Underwriters Laboratories or an equivalent 25 nationally recognized testing laboratory. 26 (b) An electric utility may not require a customer using a portable solar 27 generation device that meets the requirements of (a) of this section to 28 (1) obtain the electric utility's approval before installing or using the 29 device; 30 (2) pay a fee or charge related to the device; or 31 (3) install additional controls or equipment beyond what is integrated 01 into the device. 02 (c) An electric utility may require a customer to register a portable solar 03 generation device with the utility through a simple registration process before the 04 customer uses the device. 05 (d) An electric utility is not liable for any damage or injury caused by a 06 portable solar generation device that meets the requirements in (a) of this section. 07 (e) This section does not apply to a portable solar generation device used by a 08 customer of an electric utility that sells 5,000,000 kilowatt-hours or less of electricity 09 in a calendar year. 10 (f) In this section, "portable solar generation device" means a moveable 11 photovoltaic generation device that is designed to be 12 (1) connected to a building's electrical system through a standard 120- 13 volt alternating current outlet; and 14 (2) used primarily to offset part of an electric utility customer's 15 electricity consumption. 16 * Sec. 3. AS 42.05.381 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 17 (r) An electric utility may sell at an economic development rate excess 18 electricity that is generated from a renewable energy resource and cannot be stored 19 and used by the utility. The commission shall adopt regulations that establish criteria 20 for determining eligibility and pricing for an economic development rate. An 21 economic development rate must be lower than standard electricity rates and reflect 22 market conditions for surplus electricity generated from renewable energy resources. 23 In this subsection, "renewable energy resource" has the meaning given in 24 AS 42.05.925. 25 * Sec. 4. AS 42.05.431 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 26 (i) Costs incurred by an electric cooperative utility organized under AS 10.25 27 that participates in an electric reliability organization certificated by the commission 28 under AS 42.05.760 must be allowed in the rates charged by the utility if the costs are 29 approved by the utility's board of directors in connection with a new or purchased 30 renewable energy facility or battery energy storage system with a nameplate capacity 31 of less than 15,000 kilowatts or power purchased from a renewable energy facility or 01 battery energy storage system with a nameplate capacity of less than 15,000 kilowatts. 02 In this subsection, "renewable energy facility" means a facility that generates 03 electricity from geothermal, wind, solar, hydroelectric, hydrokinetic, tidal, or biomass 04 energy or another renewable energy resource. 05 * Sec. 5. AS 42.05.780(a) is amended to read: 06 (a) An electric reliability organization shall file with the commission in a 07 petition for approval an integrated resource plan for meeting the reliability 08 requirements of all customers within its interconnected electric energy transmission 09 network in a manner that provides the greatest value, consistent with the load-serving 10 entities' obligations. An integrated resource plan must contain an evaluation of the full 11 range of cost-effective means for load-serving entities to meet the service 12 requirements of all customers, including additional generation, transmission, battery 13 storage, and conservation or similar improvements in efficiency. An integrated 14 resource plan must include options to meet customers' collective needs in a manner 15 that provides the greatest value, consistent with the public interest, regardless of the 16 location or ownership of new facilities or conservation activities. An integrated 17 resource plan must include options for satisfying the diversified portfolio 18 standard under AS 42.05.900. 19 * Sec. 6. AS 42.05.785(a) is amended to read: 20 (a) A public utility, including a public utility that is exempt from other 21 regulation under AS 42.05.711 or another provision of this chapter, that is 22 interconnected with an interconnected electric energy transmission network served by 23 an electric reliability organization certificated by the commission may not construct a 24 large energy facility unless the commission determines that the facility 25 (1) is necessary to the interconnected electric energy transmission 26 network with which it would be interconnected; 27 (2) complies with reliability standards; [AND] 28 (3) would, in a cost-effective manner, meet the needs of a load-serving 29 entity that is substantially served by the facility; and 30 (4) is not detrimental to a load-serving entity's ability to meet the 31 diversified portfolio standard under AS 42.05.900. 01 * Sec. 7. AS 42.05.785(c) is amended to read: 02 (c) The commission may not require preapproval for a 03 (1) project for refurbishment or capitalized maintenance; 04 (2) hydropower project; 05 (3) project that generates electricity from a diversified energy 06 resource and helps a load-serving entity meet the diversified portfolio standard 07 under AS 42.05.900 [LICENSED BY THE FEDERAL ENERGY REGULATORY 08 COMMISSION BEFORE SEPTEMBER 30, 2016]. 09 * Sec. 8. AS 42.05.785(e) is amended to read: 10 (e) In this section, 11 (1) "diversified energy resource" has the meaning given in 12 AS 42.05.925; 13 (2) "large energy facility" means 14 (A) [(1)] an electric power generating plant or combination of 15 plants at a single site with a combined capacity of 15,000 kilowatts or more 16 with transmission lines that directly interconnect the plant with the 17 transmission system; 18 (B) [(2)] a high-voltage, above-ground transmission line that 19 (i) [(A)] has a capacity of 69 kilovolts or more; and 20 (ii) [(B)] is longer than 10 miles; 21 (C) [(3)] a high-voltage submarine or underground cable that 22 (i) [(A)] has a capacity of 69 kilovolts or more; and 23 (ii) [(B)] is longer than three miles; 24 (D) [(4)] an energy storage device or combination of devices at 25 a single site with a combined capacity of 15,000 kilowatts and one hour or 26 more of energy storage that directly connects with the interconnected bulk- 27 electric system; and 28 (E) [(5)] a reactive compensation device or combination of 29 devices at a single site with a combined reactive capability of 15,000 kilovars 30 or more with a step-up device to regulate interconnected bulk-electric system 31 voltage. 01 * Sec. 9. AS 42.05 is amended by adding new sections to read: 02 Article 11A. Diversified Portfolio Standard. 03 Sec. 42.05.900. Diversified portfolio standard. (a) The portfolio of a load- 04 serving entity that is subject to the standards of an electric reliability organization 05 under AS 42.05.760 must include 40 percent of megawatt hours of electricity 06 generated from diversified energy resources by December 31, 2036, adjusted 07 according to AS 42.05.905. 08 (b) When a fossil fuel and renewable energy resource are co-fired in the same 09 generating unit, the unit is considered to generate diversified electricity in direct 10 proportion to the percentage of the total heat input value represented by the heat input 11 value of the renewable energy resource. 12 (c) If electricity transmission constraints prevent delivery of diversified 13 electricity that a load-serving entity is obligated to purchase from a third party, the 14 megawatt hours of undelivered diversified electricity, adjusted according to 15 AS 42.05.905, count toward the load-serving entity's compliance with the diversified 16 portfolio standard. 17 (d) Electricity generated from diversified energy resources count toward a 18 load-serving entity's compliance with the diversified portfolio standard even if rights 19 to the environmental, social, or other nonpower attributes of the electricity generation 20 have been legally transferred to another person. 21 (e) A load-serving entity may not construct an electricity generation facility 22 that facilitates the load-serving entity's compliance with the diversified portfolio 23 standard unless the commission determines the facility is the most advantageous and 24 best value to the state, taking into account 25 (1) resources or facilities that support or improve reliability; 26 (2) resources that encourage price stability; 27 (3) resources that reduce externalized effects to individuals in the state; 28 and 29 (4) any other factors established by regulations adopted by the 30 commission. 31 Sec. 42.05.905. Compliance incentives and alternatives. (a) To calculate a 01 load-serving entity's compliance with the diversified portfolio standard, the megawatt 02 hours of electricity from a project that generates electricity from wind energy are 03 multiplied by a factor of 1.5 if 04 (1) the project is operational before January 1, 2033; 05 (2) the project has a nameplate generation capacity of at least 100 06 megawatts; and 07 (3) more than one load-serving entity acquires electricity production 08 from the project and each entity acquires at least the entity's load ratio share or 20 09 percent of the project's energy output, whichever is less; in this paragraph, "load ratio 10 share" means a percentage calculated by dividing a load-serving entity's total retail 11 electricity sales by the sum of retail electricity sales from all load-serving entities that 12 acquire electricity from the project. 13 (b) A load-serving entity may satisfy the diversified portfolio standard through 14 megawatt hours of electricity generated by distributed energy systems, multiplied by a 15 factor of 2.0, regardless of whether the electricity is acquired by the load-serving 16 entity or used by the customer. Each load-serving entity shall file a tariff with the 17 commission that establishes and justifies the average capacity factor for each 18 distributed energy system technology connected to the interconnected electric energy 19 transmission network within the entity's service area. 20 (c) In addition to generating megawatt hours of electricity from diversified 21 energy resources, a load-serving entity may satisfy the diversified portfolio standard 22 by using diversified portfolio credits from generation connected to the same 23 interconnected electric energy transmission network that serves the load-serving 24 entity's customers. 25 (d) In addition to generating megawatts hours of electricity from diversified 26 energy resources, a load-serving entity may satisfy the diversified portfolio standard 27 with megawatts of electricity supplied by energy storage systems within the load- 28 serving entity's service area, multiplied by a factor of 0.8. 29 Sec. 42.05.910. Diversified portfolio credits. (a) A load-serving entity subject 30 to the standards of an electric reliability organization under AS 42.05.760 acquires one 31 diversified portfolio credit for each megawatt hour of electricity generated from 01 diversified energy resources, adjusted according to AS 42.05.905. 02 (b) A diversified portfolio credit may be traded, sold, or otherwise transferred 03 for value. A load-serving entity that transfers a diversified portfolio credit may not use 04 the diversified electricity associated with the transferred credit to comply with the 05 diversified portfolio standard. 06 (c) A diversified portfolio credit may be used only once. A diversified 07 portfolio credit expires one year after the credit was created. 08 (d) A load-serving entity shall track the life cycle of a diversified portfolio 09 credit created, transferred, or used by the load-serving entity. Each load-serving entity 10 is responsible for demonstrating that a diversified portfolio credit used to comply with 11 the diversified portfolio standard is derived from a diversified energy resource and that 12 the diversified portfolio credit has not been previously used or transferred. 13 Sec. 42.05.915. Other diversified energy resources. (a) A load-serving entity 14 subject to the standards of an electric reliability organization under AS 42.05.760 that 15 uses or plans to use a resource to generate electrical energy at a generation facility 16 may apply to the department to designate the resource at the generation facility as a 17 diversified energy resource. The department shall evaluate the lifecycle greenhouse 18 gas emissions of the resource at the generation facility when the load-serving entity 19 submits an application with sufficient information for the department to evaluate the 20 application. The department shall designate the resource as a diversified energy 21 resource for the generation facility if 22 (1) the department determines that scope 1, 2, and 3 greenhouse gas 23 emissions occurring from the use of the resource to generate electrical energy at the 24 facility are less than 100 kilograms carbon dioxide equivalent per megawatt hour of 25 electrical energy generated across the entire lifetime of the generation facility; 26 (2) the load-serving entity submits a credible plan for maintaining 27 scope 1, 2, and 3 greenhouse gas emissions below 100 kilograms carbon dioxide 28 equivalent per megawatt hour of electrical energy generated across the entire lifetime 29 of the generation facility; and 30 (3) the department determines that the generation facility is cost 31 competitive. 01 (b) To maintain the designation of a resource as a diversified energy resource 02 under (a) of this section, a load-serving entity shall annually report to the department 03 the amount of scope 1, 2, and 3 greenhouse gas emissions occurring from the 04 generation facility using the diversified energy resource. The department shall verify 05 the greenhouse gas emissions reported by the load-serving entity. 06 (c) The department may adopt regulations to implement this section. 07 (d) In this section, "department" means the Department of Environmental 08 Conservation. 09 Sec. 42.05.920. Exemptions. A load-serving entity is exempt from compliance 10 with the diversified portfolio standard if the aggregate percentage of electricity 11 generated from diversified energy resources by all load-serving entities on the 12 interconnected electric energy transmission network, adjusted according to 13 AS 42.05.905, meets or exceeds the aggregate diversified portfolio standard for those 14 entities. 15 Sec. 42.05.925. Definitions. In AS 42.05.900 - 42.05.925, 16 (1) "distributed energy system" means a community energy facility as 17 that term is defined in AS 42.05.735 or a diversified energy resource that is located on 18 any property owned or leased by a customer within the service territory of the load- 19 serving entity that is interconnected on the customer's side of the utility meter; 20 (2) "diversified electricity" means electrical energy generated from 21 diversified energy resources; 22 (3) "diversified energy resource" means 23 (A) a renewable energy resource; 24 (B) nuclear energy; 25 (C) natural gas that 26 (i) is received through a gas pipeline that originates 27 from the area of the state lying north of 68 degrees North latitude; 28 (ii) is acquired by a load-serving entity at a stable price; 29 and 30 (iii) generates electrical energy at a cost lower than the 31 cost of generating electrical energy from renewable energy resources; 01 or 02 (D) a resource designated as a diversified energy resource by 03 the Department of Environmental Conservation under AS 42.05.915; 04 (4) "diversified portfolio credit" means a credit described in 05 AS 42.05.910; 06 (5) "diversified portfolio standard" means the percentage of a load- 07 serving entity's net electrical energy sales to customers in the entity's service area that 08 is represented by diversified energy resources as required under AS 42.05.900; 09 (6) "interconnected electric energy transmission network" has the 10 meaning given in AS 42.05.790; 11 (7) "load-serving entity" has the meaning given in AS 42.05.790; 12 (8) "megawatt hour" means 1,000,000 watts of electricity being used in 13 one hour and includes the steam equivalent of a megawatt hour; 14 (9) "renewable energy resource" means a resource, other than a fossil 15 fuel, that is ultimately derived from solar power, water power, or wind power, comes 16 from the sun or from thermal inertia of the earth, and minimizes the output of toxic 17 material in the conversion of the energy; in this paragraph, "resource" includes 18 (A) solar and solar thermal energy, wind energy, and kinetic 19 energy of moving water, including 20 (i) waves, tides, or currents; 21 (ii) run-of-river hydropower, in-river hydrokinetic; 22 (iii) conventional hydropower, lake tap hydropower; 23 (iv) water released through a dam; and 24 (v) geothermal energy; 25 (B) waste to energy systems, including 26 (i) wood; 27 (ii) landfill gas that has been manufactured in whole or 28 significant part from waste; 29 (iii) biofuels produced in the state; and 30 (iv) thermal energy produced from a geothermal heat 31 pump using municipal solid waste, including biogenic and 01 anthropogenic factions. 02 * Sec. 10. AS 42.45.045(d) is amended to read: 03 (d) The authority shall, in consultation with the advisory committee 04 established under (i) of this section and the Department of Natural Resources, 05 (1) develop a methodology for determining the order of projects that 06 may receive assistance, including separate requirements for grant eligibility, and adopt 07 regulations identifying criteria to evaluate the benefit and feasibility of projects for 08 which an applicant applies for support from the legislature, with the most weight being 09 given to projects that serve any area in which the average cost of energy to each 10 resident of the area exceeds the average cost to each resident of other areas of the 11 state, and significant weight being given to a statewide balance of grant funds and to 12 the amount of matching funds an applicant is able to make available; 13 (2) make recommendations to the legislature for renewable power 14 production reimbursement grants; and 15 (3) not later than November 15 of each year [10 DAYS AFTER THE 16 FIRST DAY OF EACH REGULAR LEGISLATIVE SESSION], submit to the 17 legislature a report summarizing and reviewing each grant application submitted under 18 this section and a recommended priority for awarding grants. 19 * Sec. 11. AS 42.45.045 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 20 (m) The advisory committee appointed under (i) of this section shall elect a 21 chair from among its members. The chair serves for a term of two years. The chair 22 may not serve for consecutive terms. After a year of not serving as chair, the member 23 is eligible for election as chair again. The advisory committee shall meet at the call of 24 the chair. 25 * Sec. 12. AS 44.46.020(a) is amended to read: 26 (a) The Department of Environmental Conservation shall 27 (1) have primary responsibility for coordination and development of 28 policies, programs, and planning related to the environment of the state and of the 29 various regions of the state; 30 (2) have primary responsibility for the adoption and enforcement of 31 regulations setting standards for the prevention and abatement of all water, land, 01 subsurface land, and air pollution, and other sources or potential sources of pollution 02 of the environment, including by way of example only, petroleum and natural gas 03 pipelines; 04 (3) promote and develop programs for the protection and control of the 05 environment of the state; 06 (4) take actions that are necessary and proper to further the policy 07 declared in AS 46.03.010; 08 (5) adopt regulations for 09 (A) the prevention and control of public health nuisances; 10 (B) the regulation of sanitation and sanitary practices in the 11 interest of public health; 12 (C) standards of cleanliness and sanitation in connection with 13 the construction, operation, and maintenance of a camp, cannery, food 14 handling establishment, food manufacturing plant, mattress manufacturing 15 establishment, industrial plant, school, barbershop, hairdressing, hair braiding, 16 manicuring, esthetics, tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, body piercing, 17 or ear piercing establishment, soft drink establishment, beer and wine 18 dispensaries, and for other similar establishments in which lack of sanitation 19 may create a condition that causes disease; 20 (D) the regulation of quality and purity of commercially 21 compressed air sold for human respiration; 22 (6) designate diversified energy resources under AS 42.05.915. 23 * Sec. 13. AS 44.46.025(a) is amended to read: 24 (a) Except as otherwise provided in AS 37.10.050 - 37.10.056, the Department 25 of Environmental Conservation may adopt regulations that prescribe reasonable fees, 26 and establish procedures for the collection of those fees, to cover the applicable direct 27 costs, not including travel except in the case of a designated regulatory service, as that 28 term is defined in AS 37.10.058, of inspections, permit preparation and administration, 29 plan review and approval, and other services provided by the department relating to 30 (1) animals and animal products under AS 03.05; food, drugs, and 31 cosmetics under AS 17.20; and public accommodations and facilities under AS 18.35; 01 (2) certificates of inspection for motor vehicles under AS 46.14.400 or 02 46.14.510; 03 (3) drinking water systems under AS 46.03.720; 04 (4) water and wastewater operator training under AS 46.30; 05 (5) waste management and disposal authorizations under 06 AS 46.03.100; 07 (6) certification of laboratories conducting environmental analyses of 08 public drinking water systems or of oil or hazardous substances, or conducting other 09 analyses required by the department; 10 (7) certification of federal permits or authorizations under 33 U.S.C. 11 1341 (sec. 401, Clean Water Act); 12 (8) regulation of point source discharges of pollutants under the 13 program authorized by AS 46.03.020(12); 14 (9) regulation of pesticides and broadcast chemicals registered under 15 AS 46.03.320(a)(4), with a reasonable fee not to exceed $120; 16 (10) licensing of pesticide applicators under AS 46.03.320(b), with a 17 reasonable fee not to exceed $25; 18 (11) designating diversified energy resources under AS 42.05.915. 19 * Sec. 14. AS 44.99.115 is amended to read: 20 Sec. 44.99.115. Declaration of state energy policy. The State of Alaska 21 recognizes that the state's economic prosperity is dependent on available, reliable, and 22 affordable residential, commercial, and industrial energy to supply the state's electric, 23 heating, and transportation needs. The state also recognizes that worldwide supply and 24 demand for fossil fuels and concerns about global climate change will affect the price 25 and volatility of fossil fuels consumed by Alaskans and exported from the state to 26 other markets. In establishing a state energy policy, the state further recognizes the 27 immense diversity of the state's geography, cultures, and resource availability, as well 28 as the universal imperative of affordable and stable energy prices. Therefore, it is 29 the policy of the state to 30 (1) institute a comprehensive and coordinated approach to supporting 31 energy efficiency and conservation by 01 (A) increasing energy efficiency and conservation of natural 02 gas and other heating fuels through 03 (i) investments focused on home energy efficiency 04 and beneficial electrification; 05 (ii) support for energy audit programs; and 06 (iii) state assistance in the development of local and 07 statewide residential and commercial energy efficiency standards 08 [ENCOURAGING STATEWIDE ENERGY EFFICIENCY CODES 09 FOR NEW AND RENOVATED RESIDENTIAL, COMMERCIAL, 10 AND PUBLIC BUILDINGS]; 11 (B) decreasing public building energy consumption through 12 conservation measures and energy-efficient technologies; and 13 (C) initiating and supporting a program to educate state 14 residents on the benefits of energy efficiency and conservation, including 15 dissemination of information on state and federal programs that reward energy 16 efficiency; 17 (2) encourage economic development by 18 (A) promoting the development of renewable and alternative 19 energy resources, including geothermal, wind, solar, hydroelectric, 20 hydrokinetic, tidal, [AND] biomass energy, and geologic hydrogen for use by 21 Alaskans; 22 (B) using renewable energy and geologic hydrogen 23 resources to produce energy products such as methanol, ammonia, and 24 sustainable aviation fuel for use by Alaskans and for export; 25 (C) [(B)] promoting the development, transport, and efficient 26 use of nonrenewable and alternative energy resources, including natural gas, 27 coal, oil, gas hydrates, heavy oil, and nuclear energy, for use by Alaskans and 28 for export; 29 (D) [(C)] working to identify and assist with development of 30 the most cost-effective, long-term sources of energy for each community 31 statewide; 01 (E) [(D)] creating and maintaining a state fiscal regime and 02 permitting and regulatory processes that encourage private sector development 03 of the state's energy resources; and 04 (F) [(E)] promoting the efficiency of energy used for 05 transportation; 06 (3) support energy research, education, and workforce development by 07 investing in 08 (A) training and education programs that will help create jobs 09 for Alaskans and that address energy conservation, efficiency, and availability, 10 including programs that address workforce development and workforce 11 transition; [AND] 12 (B) applied energy research and development of alternative and 13 emerging technologies, including university programs, to achieve reductions in 14 state energy costs and stimulate industry investment in the state; and 15 (C) the state's innovation ecosystem, including start-up 16 incubators, accelerators, venture studios, tech transfer programs, research 17 faculty innovation fellowships, and commercialization support initiatives; 18 (4) coordinate governmental functions 19 (A) by reviewing and streamlining regulatory processes and 20 balancing the economic costs of review with the level of regulation necessary 21 to protect the public interest; 22 (B) by using one office or agency, as may be specified by law, 23 to serve as a clearinghouse in managing the state's energy-related functions to 24 avoid fragmentation and duplication and to increase effectiveness; and 25 (C) by actively collaborating with federal agencies to achieve 26 the state's energy goals and to meet emissions, diversified [RENEWABLE 27 AND ALTERNATIVE] energy, and energy production targets. 28 * Sec. 15. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.